Utah statutes.
36-26-103.   Duties.

The commission shall:

(1)  comply with the rules of legislative interim committees unless those rules conflict with this section;

(2)  study and make recommendations to the Legislature concerning:

(a)  the impact of international treaties adopted by the United States Senate on the Legislature's constitutional powers to regulate state affairs, public and private;

(b)  the creation, duties and powers, and oversight of a state trade representative or state point of contact; and

(c)  the promotion of international relations and trade with Utah;

(3)  maintain active communication with:

(a)  the United States trade representative's office;

(b)  Utah's congressional delegation;

(c)  Utah's state trade representative or state point of contact, if created; and

(d)  any other organization in Utah whose mission involves international trade or relations and any other organization in the United States whose mission involves international trade or relations as the commission considers appropriate; and

(4)  have no more than four paid meetings per year.



Amended by Chapter 327, 2010 General Session

